Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4209
Health insurance, defined.

Health insurance means any hospital, surgical, or medical expense-incurred policy or health maintenance organization contract. Health insurance does not include (1) accident-only, disability income, hospital confinement indemnity, dental, or credit insurance, (2) coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, (3) medicare or insurance provided as a supplement to medicare, (4) insurance arising from workers' compensation provisions, (5) automobile medical payment insurance, (6) any other specific limited coverage, or (7) insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 266;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 13.